Hawaii statutes.
[§425-172] Personal liability and penalty.
(a) Each partner of a partnership that neglects or fails to substantially
comply with any provision of this subpart shall severally forfeit to the State
$25 for each and every month while the default continues, to be recovered by
action brought in the name of the State by the director; provided that the
director, for good cause shown, may reduce or waive the same.

(b) Any person who signs or certifies as
correct any statement or certificate filed pursuant to this subpart, or who
presents any statement or certificate for filing, knowing that the statement or
certificate is false in any material respect and with the intent to deceive or
defraud, shall be guilty of a class C felony.

(c) Any person who negligently, but without
intent to deceive or defraud, signs or certifies as correct any statement or
certificate filed pursuant to this subpart, that is in fact false, shall be
subject to a civil fine not to exceed $500. [L 2000, c 218, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next